Washington statutes.
RCW 26.12.160

When and where court may be convened.

For the purpose of conducting hearings pursuant to this chapter the family court may be convened at any time and place within the county and the hearing may be had in chambers or otherwise.

[ 1949 c 50 s 16; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 997-45.]